src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ############################## !
!This file contains the numerals !
! ############################## !




! Numerals
! ========

! The initial lexica
! ------------------



! Case forms of the basic digits
! ------------------------------

! 1-10

LEXICON AKTA
              :a%>   AKTA-NIE ;
              :a%>Q1 AKTA-OBL ;
 +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K        ;

LEXICON AKTA-VOWELHARMONY
              :å%>   AKTA-NIE ;
              :å%>Q1 AKTA-OBL ;
 +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K        ;

LEXICON AKTA-NIE
 +Sg+Nom:  K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
    +Ess:n K ;

LEXICON AKTA-OBL
       +Sg+Gen:    K                ;
    +Cmp/SgGen:%>  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
       +Sg+Acc:v   K                ;
       +Sg+Ine:n   K                ;
       +Sg+Ela:s   K                ;
       +Sg+Com:jn  K                ;
       +Sg+Par:t   K                ;

  +Sg+Ill+Attr:    K                ;
  +Sg+Ine+Attr:n   K                ;
  +Sg+Ela+Attr:t   K                ;
  +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K                ;

       +Pl+Nom:    K                ;
       +Pl+Gen:j   K                ;
       +Pl+Acc:jt  K                ;
       +Pl+Ill:jda K                ;
       +Pl+Ine:jn  K                ;
       +Pl+Ela:js  K                ;
       +Pl+Com:j   K                ;



!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-ÅVTÅ
!      +Sg+Gen:%>  K                ;
! +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>  K                ;
!   +Cmp/SgGen:%>  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
!      +Sg+Acc:%>v K                ;
!      +Sg+Ine:%>n K                ;
!      +Sg+Ela:%>s K                ;
!     ! +Sg+Com:%>jn  K                ;
!       +Sg+Par:%>t   K                ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTA
!              :a%>   ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-NIE ;
!              :a%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-OBL ;
! +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K                ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-NIE
!       +Sg+Ill:j     K                ;
!     ! +Ess:n  K                ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTA-OBL
!    +Sg+Gen:   K                ;
! +Cmp/SgGen:%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
!    +Sg+Acc:v  K                ;
!    +Sg+Ine:n  K                ;
!    +Sg+Ela:s  K                ;
!    ! +Sg+Com:jn K ;
!      +Sg+Par:t  K ;
!
! +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ;
! +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;
! +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;
! ! +Sg+Com+Attr:jn K ;
!
! ! +Pl+Nom: K ;
! ! +Pl+Gen:j K ;
! ! +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
! ! +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
! ! +Pl+Ine:jn K ;
! ! +Pl+Ela:js K ;
! ! +Pl+Com:j K ;

LEXICON GUOKTA
                          +Sg+Nom:a%>   K       ; !pred&attr
 +Err/Orth+Use/Marg+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:e%>   K       ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized !Err/Orth?
                +v2+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:a%>   K       ; !dialect differences in whether it's guokta or guovtev in accusative
                          +Sg+Ill:a%>j  K       ; !pred&attr
                             +Ess:a%>n  K       ;
    +Err/Orth+Use/Marg+Ess+Use/NG:e%>n  K       ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized
                                 :e%>Q1 GUOVTE- ; !other cases (in weak grade)
                                 :i%>Q1 GUOVTI- ; !plural
                    +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K       ;

                 +Err/Orth+Sg+Par:at%>  K       ; !guoktat
                 +Err/Orth+Sg+Par:et%>  K       ; !guoktat

LEXICON GUOVTE-
       +Sg+Acc:v  K                ;
       +Sg+Gen:   K                ;
!      +Sg+Gen:%- #                ; ! outcommented because what is this?
    +Cmp/SgGen:   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
       +Sg+Ine:n  K                ; !pred&attr
       +Sg+Ela:s  K                ; !pred&attr
       +Sg+Par:t  K                ; !pred&attr

  +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K                ; !only attr
  +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K                ; !only attr
  +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K                ; !only attr

       +Pl+Nom:   K                ;

LEXICON GUOVTI-
        +Sg+Com:jn    K               ;
   +Sg+Com+Attr:jn    K               ;

        +Pl+Gen:j     K               ;
        +Pl+Acc:jt    K               ;
        +Pl+Ill:jda   K               ;
        +Pl+Ine:jn    K               ;
        +Pl+Ela:js    K               ;
        +Pl+Com:j     K               ;

!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOKTA
!                     ẈG-LÅK-GUOKTA- ;
!              :e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTE- ;
! +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K               ;
!             !:i%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTI- ;
!
! !+Sg+Gen:a%>Q1 K ; !redunant
!       !+Sg+Gen:a%>Q1 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; !redundant
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOKTA-
! +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:a%>   K                ;
! !          +Ess:a%>n K ;
! !   +Ess+Use/NG:e%>n K                ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTE-
!         +Sg+Acc:v    K                ;
!         +Sg+Gen:     K                ;
!    +Sg+Ill+Attr:     K                ;
!      +Cmp/SgGen:     NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
!         +Sg+Ine:n    K                ;
!         +Sg+Ela:s    K                ;
!         +Sg+Par:t    K                ;
!
! !        +Sg+Gen:%- K ; ! ???
!
!!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTI-
! ! +Sg+Com:jn K ;

LEXICON GÅLMMÅ
              :å%>   GÅLMMÅ-NAIE ; !strong grade cases
              :å%>Q1 GÅLMMÅ-OBL  ; !weak grade cases
 +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K           ;

LEXICON GÅLMMÅ-NAIE
           +Sg+Nom:  K ;
 +v2+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:  K ;
           +Sg+Ill:j K ;
              +Ess:n K ;

LEXICON GÅLMMÅ-OBL
      +Sg+Acc:v   K                ;
      +Sg+Gen:    K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Ine:n   K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:s   K                ;
      +Sg+Com:jn  K                ;
      +Sg+Par:t   K                ;

 +Sg+Ill+Attr:    K                ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:n   K                ;
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:t   K                ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K                ;

      +Pl+Nom:    K                ;
      +Pl+Gen:j   K                ;
      +Pl+Acc:jt  K                ;
      +Pl+Ill:jda K                ;
      +Pl+Ine:jn  K                ;
      +Pl+Ela:js  K                ;
      +Pl+Com:j   K                ;


LEXICON NIELLJA
                          +Sg+Nom:iellja%>   K       ; !pred&attr
 +Err/Orth+Use/Marg+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:iellje%>   K       ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized !Err/Orth?
                          +Sg+Ill:ælljá%>j   K       ; !pred&attr
                             +Ess:iellja%>n  K       ;
                                 :iellje%>Q1 NIELJE- ; !other cases (in weak grade)
                                 :iellji%>Q1 NIELJI- ; !plural
                    +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:iellji%>   K       ;

                 +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:ieljja%>   K       ; !pred&attr
                 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:æljjá%>j   K       ; !pred&attr
                    +Err/Orth+Ess:ieljja%>n  K       ;
           +Err/Orth+Der5+Der/akti+Adv:ieljji%>   K       ;


LEXICON NIELJE-
       +Sg+Acc:v  K                ;
       +Sg+Gen:   K                ;
!      +Sg+Gen:%- #                ; ! outcommented because what is this?
    +Cmp/SgGen:   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
       +Sg+Ine:n  K                ; !pred&attr
       +Sg+Ela:s  K                ; !pred&attr
       +Sg+Par:t  K                ; !pred&attr

  +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K                ; !only attr
  +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K                ; !only attr
  +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K                ; !only attr

       +Pl+Nom:   K                ;
