src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON LÅGENAN
lågenanakta+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#akt AKTA ;
lågenanakta+v2+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#åvtå AKTA-OBL ; !Only weak grade
lågenanguokta+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#guokt GUOKTA ;
lågenangålmmå+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#gålmm GÅLMMÅ ;
lågenanniellja+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#niellj GUOKTA ;
lågenanvihtta+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#vidá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;
lågenanguhtta+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#gudá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;
